Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 12 Worker's Compensation [Repealed]

§§ 27-12-101 through 27-12-805.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Revision of title. —

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3, revised this title by repealing and recreating former §§

27-12-101

through 27-12-805 as present §§

27-14-101

through

27-14-804

. For tables showing revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.